Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB144.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Active service." As follows:(1) For a member of a component of the armed forces of the United States, the time served on active duty during the Global War on Terrorism, as proven by the official military records of the United States or by other evidence deemed sufficient by the department.(2) For a member of the Pennsylvania National Guard or a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, time served on active duty for the support of operations in the Global War on Terrorism whether or not the service was outside the continental United States, as proven by the official military records of the United States or by other evidence deemed sufficient by the department.(3) The term includes time spent in hospitals as a result of service-connected wounds, diseases or injuries sustained on active service, as proven by the official 20250SB0144PN0091 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 military records of the United States or by other evidence deemed sufficient by the department.(4) The term does not include time served on active duty for annual training or schooling, except for training and schooling in preparation for active duty in the Global War on Terrorism."Compensation." Money awarded to a veteran under this act."Department." The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs of the Commonwealth."Facility." A mental health establishment, hospital, clinic, institution, center, day-care center, base service unit, community mental health center or other organizational unit, or part thereof, which is devoted primarily to the diagnosis, treatment, care, rehabilitation or detention of mentally disabled persons."Fund." The Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Fund."Global War on Terrorism." The conflict starting September 11, 2001, and ending December 31, 2022, against international terrorist organizations in operations established by the United States Department of Defense."Issuing officials." The Governor, the Auditor General and the State Treasurer."Legal resident of this Commonwealth." An individual whose home of record was or is within this Commonwealth without regard to the place of enlistment, commission or induction, as proven by the official records of the United States or by other evidence deemed sufficient by the department."Parents." The term includes individuals who, for a period of not less than one year, acted in the capacity of a foster 20250SB0144PN0091 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parent to the veteran immediately prior to the veteran having attained 18 years of age."Veterans service officer." An officer of a veterans service organization trained and accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to provide assistance to veterans and their families."Veterans service organization." An organization dedicated to supporting veterans, service members, dependents and survivors, which is congressionally chartered or recognized by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.Section 3. Computation of compensation.(a) Eligibility.--Compensation shall be payable to each veteran for active service who:(1) was a legal resident of this Commonwealth at the time of service during the Global War on Terrorism; and(2) either:(i) is a legal resident of this Commonwealth at the time of application for benefits under this act; or(ii) was a legal resident of this Commonwealth when the individual died.(b) Exclusion.--Compensation shall not be paid to any of the following:(1) An individual who was separated from the armed forces of the United States under other than honorable conditions during the Global War on Terrorism or thereafter.(2) An individual who has renounced the individual's United States citizenship.(c) Compensation for service in direct support of Global War on Terrorism.--Subject to subsection (e), compensation for active service in direct support of the Global War on Terrorism 20250SB0144PN0091 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be payable in the amount of $1,000. As used in this subsection, the term "in direct support of the Global War on Terrorism" means receipt of any of the following for the Global War on Terrorism:(1) The Armed Forces Expeditionary Medal.(2) The Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal.(3) The Iraq Campaign Medal.(4) The Afghanistan Campaign Medal.(5) The Inherent Resolve Campaign Medal.(d) Compensation for active service during Global War on Terrorism.--Subject to subsection (e), compensation for active service during the Global War on Terrorism shall be payable in the amount of $500.(e) Eligibility.--An individual may not receive compensation for active service under both subsections (c) and (d).(f) Deceased veteran.--In addition to any other compensation under this section, the compensation on behalf of a veteran who died in active service or as a result of service-connected wounds, diseases or injuries sustained during active service shall be $5,000.(g) Prisoner of war.--In addition to any compensation under this section, the compensation of a veteran who was declared a prisoner of war, regardless of the length of time spent as a prisoner of war, shall, upon return, be $5,000.(h) Exclusion.--An individual who has received bonuses, benefits or compensation of a nature similar to that provided for by this act from any other state shall be ineligible for compensation. The exclusion shall not apply to a similar bonus, gratuity or compensation from the Federal Government.Section 4. Application for compensation.20250SB0144PN0091 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Application.--Applications shall be made by a veteran, the facility entitled under section 5(a) or the beneficiaries designated under section 5(b) to the department.(b) Review and determination.--Any of the following may receive and process an application under subsection (a) and determine whether to award compensation and the amount of compensation:(1) The department.(2) A veterans service officer from a veterans service organization.(3) A county director of veterans affairs.(c) Donation of compensation.--Upon application for the Global War on Terrorism bonus, a veteran may designate some or all of their compensation for donation to the Veterans' Trust Fund. Upon approval of a veteran's Global War on Terrorism compensation, the department shall transfer the designated amount to the Veterans' Trust Fund in the name of the veteran.(d) Veterans Registry requirement.--Prior to application, a veteran must register or shall be registered on their behalf with the department's Veterans Registry.(e) Application period.--The department may not accept applications on or after 20 years from the effective date of this subsection.Section 5. Incompetence or death.(a) Incompetence.--If a veteran is found to be incompetent and if no guardian has been appointed, payment shall be made for the benefit of the veteran to the person that is entitled to payment under subsection (b) or, in the absence of the person and if the veteran is in a facility, to the person in charge of the facility to be expended for the clothing and incidental 20250SB0144PN0091 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 needs of the veteran. No part of the compensation paid to a facility shall be used for the maintenance of the veteran. A statement from the person in charge of the facility in which the veteran resides shall be evidence to determine the competence of the veteran.(b) Death.--If a veteran is deceased, payment shall be made, in the order named, to the:(1) surviving spouse unless the spouse was living separate and apart from the veteran at the time of departure for active service;(2) surviving children, in equal shares; or(3) surviving parents, in equal shares.Section 6. Designation of beneficiaries.Each individual applying for compensation shall state in the application the names and addresses of each person that, under this act, would be entitled to receive compensation in the event of the death of the applicant. If the applicant dies before the payment of the compensation, the application shall be deemed to inure to the benefit of the person next entitled to compensation, and payment shall be made to the individual upon proof of identity satisfactory to the department. If no person is designated under this section as being entitled to compensation survives the veteran, the right to the compensation shall cease.Section 7. Exemption from attachment.(a) Exemption from attachment.--Sums payable under this act to a veteran or to any other authorized person under this act shall not be subject to attachment, levy or seizure under any legal or equitable process and shall be exempt from all State taxation. Subject to subsection (b), a right to compensation is 20250SB0144PN0091 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not assignable or may not serve as a security for any loan. Any assignment or loan made in violation of this section shall be void.(b) Validity.--Assignments to an incorporated or unincorporated organization of veterans, a nonprofit corporation formed solely for the purpose of aiding disabled or incapacitated veterans and the State Veterans' Commission shall be valid.Section 8. Penalty for charging fees for assisting veterans.A person that charges or collects or attempts to charge or collect, either directly or indirectly, any fee or other compensation for assisting a veteran in obtaining compensation commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.Section 9. Administration of compensation program.(a) Duties.--The department shall administer this act, including preparing and distributing application forms, verifying application information and, if satisfied of the proof of an application, approving and paying compensation.(b) Rules and regulations.--The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement, administer and enforce this act. The department shall, as soon as practicable after the effective date of this subsection, prepare and distribute a digest explaining the provisions of this act to assist veterans in filing their applications and shall prepare and distribute additional or supplemental information as may be found necessary. The department shall enlist the services of veterans service organizations to disseminate the digest and supplemental information and to receive, process and make determinations on compensation for each application. An amount of 2% of the total bond may be used for administration of this act.20250SB0144PN0091 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 10. Payment of compensation.Compensation payable shall, upon requisition by the department, be paid by the State Treasurer from the fund. The source of the fund shall be money generated from a proposed bond issue. Payments shall be made as soon as possible after money is available.Section 11. Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Fund.(a) Purpose.--The Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Fund is created in the State Treasury and shall be the source from which all compensation payments are authorized with the approval of the Governor to carry out the purposes of this act. Money in the fund shall only be utilized:(1) For the purpose of providing compensation to veterans in accordance with the provisions of this act.(2) For the administrative costs of this act, including the costs incurred in the issuance of the bonds.(b) Interfund transfers authorized.--(1) (i) If the cash balance and the current estimated receipts of the fund are insufficient at any time during a State fiscal year to meet the obligations of the Commonwealth from the fund, the State Treasurer is authorized and directed during the fiscal year to transfer from the General Fund to the fund money as the Governor directs, but in no case less than the amount necessary to meet the obligations to be paid from the fund nor more than an amount which is the smallest of:(A) the difference between the amount of debt authorized to be issued under the authority of this act and the aggregate principal amount of bonds and 20250SB0144PN0091 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 notes issued, not including refunding bonds and replacement notes; and(B) the difference between the aggregate principal amount of bonds and notes to be issued during a State fiscal year and the aggregate principal amount of bonds and notes, not including refunding bonds and replacement notes, issued during such State fiscal year.(ii) Money transferred shall be available only for the purposes for which money is appropriated from the fund. The transfers shall be made under this section upon warrant of the State Treasurer upon requisition of the Governor.(2) In order to reimburse the General Fund for money transferred from the General Fund under paragraph (1), there shall be transferred to the General Fund from the fund money from the proceeds obtained from bonds and notes issued under the authority of this act or from other available money in amounts and at times as the Governor shall direct. The retransfers shall be made upon warrant of the State Treasurer upon requisition of the Governor.Section 12. Commonwealth indebtedness.(a) Borrowing authorized.--(1) If the electorate approves a referendum question for the incurring of indebtedness in the amount and for the purposes prescribed in this act, the issuing officials, in accordance with the provisions of section 7(a)(3) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, are authorized and directed to borrow, on the credit of the Commonwealth, money not exceeding in the aggregate the sum of $50,000,000, not 20250SB0144PN0091 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including money borrowed to refund outstanding bonds, notes or replacement notes, as may be found necessary to carry out the purposes of this act.(2) As evidence of the indebtedness, general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth shall be issued to provide money necessary to carry out the purposes of this act in amounts, in such form, in such denominations and subject to such terms and conditions of issue, redemption and maturity, rate of interest and time of payment of interest as the issuing officials direct, except that the latest stated maturity date shall not exceed 20 years from the date of the first obligation issued to evidence the debt.(3) All bonds and notes issued under the authority of this act shall bear facsimile signatures of the issuing officials and a facsimile of the Great Seal of the Commonwealth and shall be countersigned by a duly authorized officer of a duly authorized loan and transfer agent of the Commonwealth.(4) All bonds and notes issued in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be direct obligations of the Commonwealth, and the full faith and credit of the Commonwealth is hereby pledged for the payment of the interest thereon, as it becomes due, and the payment of the principal at maturity. The principal of and interest on the bonds and notes shall be payable in lawful money of the United States.(5) All bonds and notes issued under the provisions of this section shall be exempt from taxation for State and local purposes.(6) The bonds may be issued as coupon bonds or 20250SB0144PN0091 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered as to both principal and interest as the issuing officials may determine. If interest coupons are attached, the coupons shall contain the facsimile signature of the State Treasurer.(7) The issuing officials shall provide for the amortization of the bonds in substantial and regular amounts over the term of the debt so that the bonds of each issue shall mature within a period not to exceed the appropriate amortization period as specified by the issuing officials but in no case in excess of 20 years. The first retirement of principal shall be stated to mature prior to the expiration of a period of time equal to one-tenth of the time from the date of the first obligation issued to evidence the debt to the date of the expiration of the term of the debt. Retirements of principal shall be regular and substantial if made in annual or semiannual amounts whether by stated serial maturities or by mandatory sinking fund retirements.(8) The issuing officials are authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any debt issued under the provisions of this act and then outstanding, either by voluntary exchange with the holders of the outstanding debt or providing money to redeem and retire the outstanding debt with accrued interest, any premium payable on the debt and the costs of issuance and retirement of the debt, at maturity or at any call date. The issuance of the refunding bonds, the maturities and other details, the rights of the holders and the duties of the issuing official shall be governed by the provisions of this section. Refunding bonds, which are not subject to the aggregate limitation of $50,000,000 of debt to 20250SB0144PN0091 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be issued under this act, may be issued by the issuing officials to refund debt originally issued or to refund bonds previously issued for refunding purposes.(9) If any action is to be taken or decision made by the Governor, the Auditor General and the State Treasurer acting as issuing officials and the three officers are not able unanimously to agree, the action or decision of the Governor and either the Auditor General or the State Treasurer shall be binding and final.(b) Sale of bonds.--(1) Upon issuance, bonds shall be offered for sale at not less than 98% of the principal amount and accrued interest and shall be sold by the issuing officials to the highest and best bidder or bidders after due public advertisement on the terms and conditions and upon open competitive bidding as the issuing officials direct. The manner and character of the advertisement and the time of advertising shall be prescribed by the issuing officials.(2) Any portion of any bond issued and not sold or subscribed for at public sale may be disposed of by private sale by the issuing officials in the manner and at prices, not less than 98% of the principal amount and accrued interest, as the Governor shall direct.(2.1) No commission shall be allowed or paid for the sale of any bonds issued under the authority of this act.(3) Upon issuance of bonds, the bonds of each issue shall constitute a separate series to be designated by the issuing officials or may be combined for sale as one series with other general obligation bonds of the Commonwealth.(4) Until permanent bonds can be prepared, the issuing 20250SB0144PN0091 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officials may issue, in lieu of permanent bonds, temporary bonds in the form and with privileges as to registration and exchange for permanent bonds as may be determined by the issuing officials.(5) Proceeds from the sale of bonds and notes, except refunding bonds and replacement notes, under the provisions of this act shall be paid into the fund. The proceeds shall be paid by the State Treasurer to the department for purposes of payment of compensation. The proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds and replacement notes shall be paid to the State Treasurer and applied to the payment of principal, the accrued interest and premium, if any, and cost of redemption of the bonds and notes for which the obligations shall have been issued.(6) Pending application for the purposes authorized, money held or deposited by the State Treasurer may be invested or reinvested as are other funds in the custody of the State Treasurer in the manner provided by law. All earnings received from the investment or deposit of money shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the fund. The earnings in excess of bond discounts allowed, expenses paid for the issuance of bonds and notes and interest arbitrage rebates due to the Federal Government shall be transferred annually to the fund. Interest or investment income shall be applied to assist in the payment of the debt service incurred in connection with this act.(7) The Auditor General shall prepare the necessary registry book to be kept in the office of the duly authorized loan and transfer agent of the Commonwealth for the registration of any bonds, at the request of owners thereof, 20250SB0144PN0091 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 according to the terms and conditions of issue directed by the issuing officials.(8) There is appropriated to the State Treasurer from the fund as much money as may be necessary for all costs and expenses in connection with the issue of and sale and registration of the bonds and notes in connection with this act and the payment of interest arbitrage rebates or proceeds of the bonds and notes.(c) Temporary financing authorization.--(1) Pending the issuance of bonds of the Commonwealth as authorized, the issuing officials are authorized, in accordance with the provisions of this act and on the credit of the Commonwealth, to make temporary borrowings not to exceed three years in anticipation of the issuance of bonds in order to provide money deemed advisable prior to the issuance of bonds. In order to provide for and in connection with the temporary borrowings, the issuing officials are authorized in the name and on behalf of the Commonwealth to enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreement or agreements, or other agreement or agreements with any banks or trust companies or other lending institutions, investment banking firms or persons in the United States having power to enter into the same, which agreements may contain provisions not inconsistent with the provisions of this act as may be authorized by the issuing officials.(2) All temporary borrowings made under this section shall be evidenced by notes of the Commonwealth which shall be issued in amounts not exceeding in the aggregate the applicable statutory and constitutional debt limitation in the form and in the denominations and subject to terms and 20250SB0144PN0091 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conditions of sale and issue, prepayment or redemption and maturity, rate or rates of interest and time of payment of interest as the issuing officials shall authorize and direct in accordance with this act. The authorization and direction may provide for the subsequent issuance of replacement notes to refund outstanding notes or replacement notes, which shall, upon issuance, evidence the borrowing and may specify other terms and conditions with respect to the notes and replacement notes authorized for issuance as the issuing officials may determine and direct.(3) If the authorization and direction of the issuing officials provide for the issuance of replacement notes, the issuing officials are authorized in the name and on behalf of the Commonwealth to issue, enter into or authorize and direct the State Treasurer to enter into agreements with any banks, trust companies, investment banking firms or other institutions or persons in the United States having the power to enter the same:(i) To purchase or underwrite an issue or series of issues or notes.(ii) To credit, to enter into any purchase, loan or credit agreements, to draw money pursuant to the agreements on the terms and conditions set forth therein and to issue notes as evidence of borrowings made under any such agreements.(iii) To appoint an issuing and payment agent or agents with respect to notes.(iv) To do other acts as may be necessary or appropriate to provide for the payment, when due, of the interest on and the principal of such notes. Such 20250SB0144PN0091 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agreements may provide for the compensation of any purchasers or underwriters of notes or replacement notes by discounting the purchase price of the notes or by payment of a fixed fee or commission at the time of issuance and all other costs and expenses, including fees for agreements related to the notes, issuing and paying agent costs and costs and expenses of issuance, may be paid from the proceeds of the notes.(4) If the authorization and direction of the issuing officials provide for the issuance of replacement notes, the State Treasurer shall:(i) at or prior to the time of delivery of these notes or replacement notes, determine the principal amounts, dates of issue, interest rate or rates, or procedures for establishing rates, rates of discount, denominations and all other terms and conditions relating to the issuance and shall perform all acts and things necessary to pay or cause to be paid, when due, all principal of and interest on the notes being refunded by replacement notes; and(ii) ensure that the issuing officials may draw upon money available for that purpose pursuant to any purchase, loan or credit agreements established with respect thereto, subject to the authorization and direction of the issuing officials.(5) Outstanding notes evidencing borrowings may be funded and retired by the issuance and sale of the bonds of the Commonwealth. The refunding bonds must be issued and sold not later than a date three years after the date of issuance of the first notes evidencing the borrowings to the extent 20250SB0144PN0091 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that payment of the notes has not otherwise been made or provided for by sources other than proceeds of replacement notes.(6) The proceeds of all temporary borrowing shall be paid to the State Treasurer to be held and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of this act.(d) Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund.--(1) The Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund is created in the State Treasury. All bonds issued under the authority of this act shall be redeemed at maturity, together with all interest due on the bonds, and the principal and interest payments shall be paid from the Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund. For the specific purpose of redeeming the bonds at maturity and paying all interest thereon in accordance with the information received from the Governor, the General Assembly shall appropriate money to the Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund for the payment of interest on the bonds and notes and the principal thereof at maturity. All money paid into the Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund and all of the money not necessary to pay accruing interest shall be invested by the State Treasurer in securities as are provided by law for the investment of the sinking funds of the Commonwealth.(2) The State Treasurer, with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to use any of the money in the fund not necessary for the purposes of the referendum authorizing the indebtedness necessary to carry out this act, for the 20250SB0144PN0091 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchase and retirement of all or any part of the bonds and notes issued pursuant to the authorization of this act. In the event that all or any part of the bonds and notes are purchased, they shall be canceled and returned to the loan and transfer agent as canceled and paid bonds and notes, and, thereafter, all payments of interest thereon shall cease. The canceled bonds, notes and coupons, together with any other canceled bonds, notes and coupons, shall be destroyed as promptly as possible after cancellation but not later than two years after cancellation. A certification evidencing the destruction of the canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be provided by the loan and transfer agent to the issuing officials. All canceled bonds, notes and coupons shall be so marked as to make the canceled bonds, notes and coupons nonnegotiable.(3) The State Treasurer shall determine and report to the Secretary of the Budget by November 1 of each year the amount of money necessary for the payment of interest on outstanding obligations and the principal of the obligations, if any, for the following fiscal year and the times and amounts of the payments. It shall be the duty of the Governor to include in every budget submitted to the General Assembly full information relating to the issuance of bonds and notes under the provisions of this act and the status of the Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund of the Commonwealth for the payment of interest on the bonds and notes and the principal thereof at maturity.(4) The General Assembly shall appropriate an amount equal to the sums as may be necessary to meet repayment obligations for principal and interest for deposit into the 20250SB0144PN0091 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Sinking Fund.(e) Expiration.--Authorization to issue bonds and notes, not including refunding bonds and replacement notes, for the purpose of this act shall expire 10 years from the effective date of this subsection.Section 13. Question.(a) Submission of question to electorate.--The question of incurring indebtedness of up to $50,000,000 for the purposes specified in this act shall be submitted to the electors at the next general election following the effective date of this subsection.(b) Certification.--The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall certify the question to the county boards of elections.(c) Form of question.--The question shall be in substantially the following form:Do you favor indebtedness by the Commonwealth of up to $50,000,000 for the payment of compensation for service in the Global War on Terrorism?(d) Election.--The election shall be conducted in accordance with the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, except that the time limits for advertisement of notice of the election may be waived as to the question.(e) Proceeds.--Proceeds of the borrowing shall be used for the payment of compensation for service in or in support of the Global War on Terrorism.Section 14. Appropriations.(a) Compensation appropriation.--For the purpose of payment for the compensation to veterans, staff services, postage and 20250SB0144PN0091 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other necessary expenses incurred by the department in the administration of this act, sums, or as much thereof as may be necessary, are specifically appropriated to the department out of any money in the Global War on Terrorism Veterans' Compensation Bond Fund.(b) Continuing appropriations.--The appropriation under subsection (a) shall be a continuing appropriation and shall not lapse.Section 15. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) This section and sections 9 and 13(a), (b), (c) and (d) shall take effect immediately.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect after the certification of the approval by the electorate to incur the indebtedness necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.20250SB0144PN0091 - 21 - 12345678910111213141516